New Jersey, session 222, A5052.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A construction company, contractor, or subcontractor may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against another construction company, contractor, or subcontractor for: (1)   wage or benefit theft; (2)   misclassification of employees; (3)   tax or insurance fraud; (4)   manipulation of the process by which the construction company, contractor, or subcontractor submits bids for work; (5)   falsification of documentation, including falsely claiming certification not obtained; and (6)   any action or attempt of an action deemed in violation of the consumer fraud act pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) or the New Jersey Antitrust Act, P.L.1970, c.73 (C.56:9-1 et seq.). b.    The construction company, contractor, or subcontractor shall notify: (1)   the potential defendant of the action at least 30 days prior to the commencement of the action; and (2)   the Department of Labor and Workforce Development when the company, contractor, or subcontractor brings an action. c.     The court shall award a prevailing plaintiff in the action reasonable attorneys fees and costs, including expert witness fees. d.    As used in this act: Construction company means a sole proprietor, limited liability company, corporation, or any other type of business entity organized under the law of the State that builds, renovates, or maintains any building, road, bridge, private residence, or other structure in the State. Contractor means the same as the term is defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.50). Subcontractor means the same as the term is defined pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1987, c.150 (C.34:11A-2). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.